Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act:

(1) Advisory board means the Reentry Continuity Advisory Board established in section 47-1117;

(2) Board means the Board of Parole;

(3) Committed offender has the same meaning as in section 83-170;

(4) Community work release and reentry center or center means a residential home, halfway house, or other facility operated by a private provider pursuant to an agreement in writing with the department for providing housing and supervision of committed offenders placed in the center by the department for work release and for vocational training, education, programming, or behavioral health or mental health treatment;

(5) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;

(6) Individualized release plan means a detailed written plan outlining a committed offender's future vocational goals, training, employment, and needed treatment services following the committed offender's release from a community work release and reentry center;

(7) Private provider means a partnership, corporation, association, joint venture, organization, or similar entity which is operated on a nonprofit basis and which, under a contract with the department, has agreed to operate a community work release and reentry center pursuant to the act;

(8) Probation administration means the Office of Probation Administration;

(9) Reentering person means an individual who is subject to supervision by the board or probation administration, not including juvenile probation, or who was recently in the custody of the department or a county jail and was released with no supervision;

(10) Reentry housing means temporary housing for reentering persons, generally in the first year following a period of incarceration; and

(11)(a) Reentry housing facility means a facility which is owned or operated by a private organization, whether nonprofit or for-profit, that receives direct payment from the board, probation administration, or department to provide reentry housing.

(b) Reentry housing facility includes, but is not limited to, a community work release and reentry center.

(c) Reentry housing facility does not include a health care facility as defined in section 71-413.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 60.